Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.300

Local boards of health—Membership.

(1) The state board of health shall adopt rules establishing the appointment process for the members of local boards of health who are not elected officials. The selection process established by the rules must:

(a) Be fair and unbiased; and

(b) Ensure, to the extent practicable, that the membership of local boards of health include a balanced representation of elected officials and nonelected people with a diversity of expertise and lived experience.

(2) The rules adopted under this section must go into effect no later than one year after July 25, 2021.

[ 2021 c 205 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—2021 c 205: See note following RCW 43.70.675.